Illinois, session 104th, HB3708.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 1-5 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/1-5)7    Sec. 1-5. Use of terms. 8    (a) A reference in another Act to a town (other than an 9incorporated town) shall be deemed a reference to a township 10as that that term is used in this Code.11    (b) A reference in another Act to the board of trustees of 12a town (other than an incorporated town) or township, the 13board of town trustees, or the board of township trustees 14shall be deemed a reference to the township board as that term 15is used in this Code.16    (c) A reference in another Act to an officer of a town 17(other than an incorporated town) shall be deemed a reference 18to a township officer as that term is used in this Code.19(Source: P.A. 88-62.)